Massachusetts, session 194th, H3627.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 9 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking the third sentence and inserting in place thereof the following:-
A tractor, trailer, truck or all-terrain vehicle may be operated without such registration
upon any way for a distance not exceeding one-half mile, if said tractor, trailer, truck or all-
terrain vehicle is used exclusively for agricultural purposes consistent with section 1A of the
General Laws chapter 128, or between one-half mile and 10 miles if said tractor, trailer, truck or
all-terrain vehicle is used exclusively for such agricultural purposes and the owner thereof
maintains in full force a policy of liability insurance which conforms to the provisions of section
113A of the General Laws chapter 175, or for a distance not exceeding three hundred yards, if
such tractor, trailer or truck is used for industrial purposes other than agricultural purposes, for
of 2

the purpose of going from property owned or occupied by the owner of such tractor, trailer or
truck to other property so owned or occupied.
For the purposes of this section, an all-terrain vehicle shall include those vehicles known
as a quad, quad bike, three-wheeler, four-wheeler, or quadricycle as defined by the American
National Standards Institute. Persons utilizing all-terrain vehicles under these provisions shall
annually notify the police department in the municipalities in which they are to operate of the
public way and sections of public way on which they operate in the course of agricultural
purposes. Failure to provide such notification may result in penalties pursuant to the General
Laws chapter 90, section 20.
All-terrain vehicles operating under the provisions of this section shall be equipped with
a safety flag of not less than 36 square inches in area which shall be elevated to no less than 6
feet from the ground. All-terrain vehicles must be equipped with a flashing red light mounted to
the rear of the vehicle. If designed to travel at 25 miles per hour or less, the vehicle shall display
a “slow moving vehicle emblem” as governed by the General Laws chapter 90, section 7.
Vehicles traveling on a public way subject to this section, shall be operated by a licensed
driver. No all-terrain vehicle may operate on a public way between sunset and sunrise. No all-
terrain vehicle may be operated on a public way for recreational or other purposes except as
authorized in this section and the General Laws chapter 90B, section 25, regarding crossing road
at designated points.
of 2